Massachusetts, session 194th, H3153.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 subsection (b) of Chapter 62C of the general laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the section and inserting in place thereof the
following:-
(b) Every executor, administrator, trustee, guardian, conservator, trustee in bankruptcy,
assignee for the benefit of creditors and receiver, other than a receiver of a business corporation,
every fiduciary referred to in section twenty-five of chapter sixty-two and every other person
receiving income taxable under chapter sixty-two which exceeds two hundred dollars, shall make
an annual return of his taxable income. An executor or administrator shall file a return under this
section if his decedent received any such amount not returned by the decedent as to which a tax
under chapter sixty-two may still be assessed within the time limited by section twenty-six of
of 2

this chapter. If a person has been appointed executor or administrator after January first in any
year, the return of such income received by his decedent but not reported by him shall be due and
shall be filed on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the date of such
appointment. Every such fiduciary intending to make final distribution of an estate or trust before
the end of any year shall file immediately prior to such distribution a return under this section of
all such income received by him and by his decedent during said year and prior to such
distribution, and the taxes thereon shall become due and payable forthwith.
of 2